Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2746
Flock plan.

Each owner or authorized representative of the owner of a flock under quarantine shall file a flock plan with the department within a maximum of thirty days after the date of issuance of the quarantine. The flock plan shall include followup inspections. Each owner or authorized representative shall follow as standards for the flock plan those indicated by the scrapie control and eradication program and those indicated by the postexposure management and monitoring plan.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 46.